Maryland, session 2026, HB1625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1625*

HOUSE BILL 1625
Article – Health – General
13–111.
(a) The Department shall establish a coordinated statewide system for screening
all newborn infants in the State for certain hereditary and congenital disorders associated
with severe problems of health or development, except when the parent or guardian of the
newborn infant objects.
(b) Except as provided in § 13–112 of this subtitle, the Department’s public health
laboratory is the sole laboratory authorized to perform tests on specimens from newborn
infants collected to screen for hereditary and congenital disorders as determined under
subsection (d)(2) of this section.
(c) The system for newborn screening shall include:
(1) Laboratory testing and the reporting of test results; and
(2) Follow–up activities to facilitate the rapid identification and treatment
of an affected child.
(d) In consultation with the State Advisory Council on Hereditary and Congenital
Disorders, the Department shall:
(1) Establish protocols for a health care provider to obtain and deliver test
specimens to the Department’s public health laboratory;
(2) Determine the screening tests that the Department’s public health
laboratory is required to perform;
(3) Maintain a coordinated statewide system for newborn screening that
carries out the purpose described in subsection (c) of this section that includes:
(i) Communicating the results of screening tests to the health care
provider of the newborn infant;
(ii) Locating newborn infants with abnormal test results;
(iii) Sharing newborn screening information between hospitals,
health care providers, treatment centers, and laboratory personnel;
(iv) Delivering needed clinical, diagnostic, and treatment
information to health care providers, parents, and caregivers; and
(v) Notifying parents and guardians of newborn infants that
laboratories other than the Department’s public health laboratory are authorized to

HOUSE BILL 1625 3
perform postscreening confirmatory or diagnostic tests on newborn infants for hereditary
and congenital disorders; and
(4) Adopt regulations that set forth the standards and requirements for
newborn screening for hereditary and congenital disorders that are required under this
subtitle, including:
(i) Performing newborn screening tests;
(ii) Coordinating the reporting, follow–up, and treatment activities
with parents, caregivers, and health care providers; and
(iii) Establishing fees for newborn screening [that do not exceed] IN
an amount THAT IS NOT LESS THAN THE AMOUNT THAT IS sufficient to cover the
administrative, laboratory, and follow–up costs associated with the performance of
screening tests under this subtitle.
(e) (1) (i) The Department shall screen for each core condition listed in the
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services’ Recommended Uniform Screening Panel
AS OF MAY 31 JANUARY 1, 2026.
(ii) [Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the Department
shall implement testing for a core condition within 1 year and 6 months after the core
condition is added to the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel] IF A CORE CONDITION
IS ADDED TO THE RECOMMENDED UNIFORM SCREENING PANEL, THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL SHALL:
1. ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT ON THE RISKS, HARMS,
ACCESSIBILITY, AND COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING TESTING FOR THE CONDITION; AND
2. PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS ON WHETHER THE
DEPARTMENT SHOULD IMPLEMENT TESTING FOR THE CONDITION.
(III) IF A CORE CONDITION IS ADDED TO THE RECOMMENDED
UNIFORM SCREENING PANEL, THE DEPARTMENT MAY, AFTER CONSIDERING THE
ADVICE AND RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:
1. IMPLEMENT TESTING FOR THE CORE CONDITION;
2. DELAY THE IMPLEMENTATION OF TESTING FOR THE
CORE CONDITION; OR
3. DECIDE NOT TO IMPLEMENT TESTING FOR THE CORE
CONDITION.

HOUSE BILL 1625
[(iii)] (IV) 1. If the Department DECIDES TO IMPLEMENT
TESTING FOR A CORE CONDITION, BUT is unable to implement testing within [1 year
and 6 months] 2 YEARS after a core condition is added to the Recommended Uniform
Screening Panel due to a delay in the procurement of equipment or supplies needed to
implement the testing, the Department shall report to the Senate Finance Committee and
the House Health [and Government Operations] Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, within 1 year and 3 months after the addition of the core
condition to the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel and every 3 months thereafter
until the testing for the core condition is implemented.
2. IF THE DEPARTMENT DECIDES NOT TO IMPLEMENT
TESTING FOR THE CORE CONDITION OR DECIDES TO DELAY IMPLEMENTATION FOR
A PERIOD OF MORE THAN 2 YEARS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE
SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH COMMITTEE, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, WITHIN 1
YEAR AND 3 MONTHS AFTER THE ADDITION OF THE CORE CONDITION TO THE
RECOMMENDED UNIFORM SCREENING PANEL.
[2.] 3. A report required under [subsubparagraph]
SUBSUBPARAGRAPHS 1 OR 2 of this subparagraph shall include [the reason for the
delay]:
A. THE JUSTIFICATION FOR THE DECISION TO NOT
IMPLEMENT TESTING; OR
B. THE JUSTIFICATION FOR DELAYING THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF TESTING and the anticipated timeline for implementation.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the Secretary of Health
and Human Services issues federal recommendations on critical congenital heart disease
screening of newborns, the Department shall adopt the federal screening recommendations.
(3) The Department may screen for any condition recommended by the
Advisory Council and approved by the Secretary.
(f) (1) The Secretary shall pay all fees collected under the provisions of this
subtitle to the Comptroller.
(2) The Comptroller shall distribute the fees to the Newborn Screening
Program Fund established under § 13–113 of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.